Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0725.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 109y. An eligible individual may receive medical assistance coverage for donor human milk for the eligible individual's infant for up to 2 years after the eligible individual is discharged from the hospital after childbirth or 2 years after childbirth if both of the following conditions are met: (a) A provider has written a prescription for the donor human milk. (b) Either of the following is true: (i) The birthing person is unable to provide milk, whether temporary or not. (ii) The infant was born before the thirty-fourth week of the pregnancy or weighed less than 1,800 grams at birth. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect January 1, 2026.